Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 47 Motor Vehicle Reparations Act
31-47-16.
Assigned risk plans.

After consultation with insurance companies authorized to issue automobile liability policies in this state, the insurance commissioner shall approve a reasonable plan or plans for the equitable apportionment among the insurance companies of applicants for those policies and for motor vehicle liability policies who are in good faith entitled to them, and are unable to procure those policies through ordinary methods. When any plan has been approved, all insurance companies shall subscribe to and participate in it. Any applicant for any automobile liability policy, any person insured under any assigned risk plan, and any insurance company affected, may appeal to the insurance commissioner from any ruling or decision of the manager or committee designated to operate the plan. Any person aggrieved under this section by any order or act of the insurance commissioner may, within ten (10) days after notice of it, file a petition in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol for a review of the petition. The court shall summarily hear the petition and may make any appropriate order or decree.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-17.
Insurance companies.

If there is reason to believe that there has been a noncompliance with any of the provisions of this chapter, every insurance company authorized to issue automobile liability policies shall be required upon request to provide the division of motor vehicles with information sufficient to evidence an individual’s compliance with this chapter within ten (10) days of request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

31-47-18.
Automobile liability insurance rates.

Any general or public law to the contrary notwithstanding, the commissioner shall, after consulting with all insurers licensed to write automobile liability insurance in this state, promulgate regulations which provide that automobile liability insurance rates shall take into account the past claim experience of the applicant for the insurance and incorporate the principles used in so called “merit rating” or “experience rating” rate plans which are now in effect in other states.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 46.

31-47-19.
Constitutionality.

If any part or parts of this chapter shall be held unconstitutional, the unconstitutionality shall not affect the validity of the remaining parts of this chapter. The legislature declares that it would have passed the remaining parts of this chapter if it had known that any part or parts of it would be declared unconstitutional.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 1.